North Carolina, session 2025, HB1148.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to provide additional funds for all income-eligible, four-year-old children in this State to
participate in the North Carolina Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1148-v-1*